Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.110

Application under RCW 6.13.100 must be made by verified petition—Contents.

The application under RCW 6.13.100 must be made by filing a verified petition, showing:

(1) The fact that an execution has been levied upon the homestead.

(2) The name of the owner of the homestead property.

(3) That the net value of the homestead exceeds the amount of the homestead exemption.

[ 1987 c 442 s 211; 1981 c 329 s 15; 1895 c 64 s 10; RRS s 538. Formerly RCW 6.12.150.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.